Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-950
State colleges; public service and continuing education activities; regional responsibility; exception.

The state colleges shall have regional responsibility for public service and continuing education activities, except in areas where such colleges have the ability to provide a particular service on a statewide basis.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 34.